Illinois, session 104th, HB2812.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Medical Patient Rights Act is amended by 5changing Section 3.2 as follows: 6    (410 ILCS 50/3.2)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 5403.2)7    Sec. 3.2. Visitation rights, policies, and procedures. 8    (a) Every health care facility in this State shall permit 9visitation by any person or persons designated by a patient 10who is 18 years of age or older and who is allowed rights of 11visitation unless (1) the facility does not allow any 12visitation for a patient or patients, or (2) the facility or 13the patient's physician determines that visitation would 14endanger the physical health or safety of a patient or 15visitor, or would interfere with the operations of the 16facility.17    (a-5) Notwithstanding subsection (a), during a period for 18which the Governor has issued a proclamation under Section 7 19of the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act declaring that 20a disaster exists or in the event of an outbreak or epidemic of 21a communicable disease in the community in which the health 22care facility is located, a health care facility shall ensure 23an opportunity for at least one visitor to visit a resident or   HB2812- 2 -LRB104 09994 BDA 20064 b1patient of the health care facility. A health care facility 2shall not count a clergy member toward any limit on the number 3of visitors permitted to visit a resident or patient at one 4time and shall permit a clergy member to visit with a resident 5or patient in addition to the permitted number of visitors. 6Visitation shall be subject to the guidelines, conditions, and 7limitations of the health care facility's visitation policy 8and any rules or guidelines established by the U.S. Centers 9for Medicare and Medicaid Services and the Centers for Disease 10Control and Prevention.11    Visitors under this subsection may be required by the 12health care facility to submit to health screenings necessary 13to prevent the spread of infectious disease. A health care 14facility may restrict facility access to a visitor who does 15not pass its health screening requirement. A health care 16facility may require a visitor to adhere to infection control 17procedures, including wearing personal protective equipment. A 18health care facility may deny visitation under this Act if 19visitation would endanger the physical health or safety of a 20patient, the visitor, or health care workers or would 21otherwise create a public health or safety problem. 22    (a-10) Notwithstanding subsection (a), a skilled nursing 23home, extended care facility, or intermediate care facility 24may prohibit an individual from visiting a resident or patient 25of the nursing home or facility if specific facts demonstrate 26that the individual would endanger his or her physical health   HB2812- 3 -LRB104 09994 BDA 20064 b1or safety or the health or safety of a resident, patient, or 2health care worker of the nursing home or facility. Any denial 3of visitation under this subsection (a-10) shall be in writing 4and shall be provided to the individual and the resident or 5patient with whom the individual was denied visitation. 6    (a-15) Each skilled nursing home, extended care facility, 7and intermediate care facility shall:8        (1) inform each resident of the nursing home or 9    facility (or that individual's representative) of the 10    resident's visitation rights and the nursing home or 11    facility's visitation-related policies and procedures, 12    including any clinical or safety-related restriction or 13    limitation on visitation rights, the reasons for the 14    restriction or limitation, and the persons to whom the 15    restriction or limitation may apply;16        (2) inform each resident of the resident's right:17            (A) to consent to receive designated visitors, 18        such as a spouse, including, without limitation, a 19        same-sex spouse; a domestic partner, including, 20        without limitation, a same-sex domestic partner; 21        another family member; or a friend; and22            (B) to withdraw or deny that consent at any time;23        (3) not restrict, limit, or otherwise deny visitation 24    privileges on the basis of race, color, national origin, 25    religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, or 26    disability; and  HB2812- 4 -LRB104 09994 BDA 20064 b1        (4) ensure that all of the resident's visitors enjoy 2    full and equal visitation privileges, consistent with the 3    resident's preferences. 4    (a-20) Notwithstanding subsection (a), every health care 5facility in this State shall permit the next of kin of a 6patient who is on life support to remain with the patient, at 7the patient's bedside, irrespective of regular hours of 8visitation. Every health care facility in this State may 9institute reasonable policies, including reasonable 10requirements that promote the health, safety, and welfare of 11the next of kin, the patient, and the employees and other 12patients of the health care facility without revoking the 13basic right afforded under this subsection to the next of kin 14of a patient who is on life support to remain with the patient 15or at the patient's bedside. In this subsection, "next of kin" 16means one and only one person who is a spouse, or, in the 17absence of a spouse, a parent, or, in the absence of a parent, 18a child, or, in the absence of a child, a sibling. 19    (b) Except as provided in subsection (a-5) and subsection 20(a-20), nothing in this Section shall be construed to further 21limit or restrict the right of visitation provided by other 22provisions of law or to restrict the ability of a health care 23facility to regulate hours of visitation, the number of 24visitors per patient, or the movement of visitors within the 25health care facility.26    (c) For the purposes of this Section a "health care   HB2812- 5 -LRB104 09994 BDA 20064 b1facility" does not include a developmental disability 2facility, a mental health facility or a mental health center.3(Source: P.A. 102-989, eff. 5-27-22.)